District of Columbia statutes.
10-1335

Administration of the Foundation.

The Secretary to the Council is responsible for the administration of the Foundation. No more than 15% of the total funds raised in any given year can be used for the administrative support, including staff, supplies, and promotional activities of the Foundation.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-180, § 6, 43 DCR 4246

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-735.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1331.